Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.540

Sex offenders and kidnapping offenders—Central registry—Reimbursement to counties.

(1) The county sheriff shall forward registration information, photographs, and fingerprints obtained pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130, including the sex offender's risk level classification and any notice of change of address, to the Washington state patrol within five working days.

(2) Upon implementation of RCW 4.24.550(5)(a), the Washington state patrol shall maintain a central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders required to register under RCW 9A.44.130 and shall adopt rules consistent with chapters 10.97, 10.98, and 43.43 RCW as are necessary to carry out the purposes of RCW 9A.44.130, 9A.44.140, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 46.20.187, 70.48.470, and 72.09.330. The Washington state patrol shall reimburse the counties for the costs of processing the offender registration, including taking the offender's fingerprints and photograph.

[ 2011 c 337 s 8; 2006 c 136 s 1; 2002 c 118 s 2; 1998 c 220 s 4; 1997 c 113 s 6; 1990 c 3 s 403.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in RCW 9A.44.128 apply to this section.

Conflict with federal requirements—2002 c 118: See note following RCW 4.24.550.

Severability—1998 c 220: See note following RCW 9A.44.130.

Findings—1997 c 113: See note following RCW 4.24.550.

Sex offense and kidnapping offense defined: RCW 9A.44.128.